Mississippi, session 2026, SB2377.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 73-42-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-42-13.  (1)  After proper notice and an opportunity for a hearing, the Secretary of State may deny, suspend, revoke or refuse to renew a registration for conduct that would have justified denial of registration under Section 73-42-11(3) or for a violation of any provision of this chapter. (2)  (a)  The Secretary of State shall appoint at least one (1) hearing officer for the purpose of holding hearings, compiling evidence and rendering decisions under this section and Section 73-42-11.  The hearing officer shall fix the date for an adjudicatory hearing and notify the athlete agent involved.  The hearing shall be held at a location to be designated by the hearing officer.  Unless the time period is extended by the hearing officer, the hearing shall be held not less than fifteen (15) nor more than thirty (30) days after the mailing of notice to the athlete agent involved.  At the conclusion of the hearing, the hearing officer shall make a recommendation regarding the registration of the athlete agent involved.  The Secretary of State shall then take appropriate action by final order. (b)  Any athlete agent whose application for registration has been denied or not renewed, or whose registration has been revoked or suspended by the Secretary of State, within thirty (30) days after the date of such final order, shall have the right of a trial de novo on appeal to the circuit court in Mississippi in the county of residence of the athlete agent, the student-athlete, or the educational institution.  If the secretary's final order is supported by substantial evidence and does not violate a state or federal law, then it shall be affirmed by the circuit court.  Either party shall have the right of appeal to the Supreme Court as provided by law from any decision of the circuit court.  No athlete agent shall be allowed to deliver services to a student-athlete domiciled or residing in Mississippi while any such appeal is pending. (3)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsection (1) of this section, the secretary shall be authorized to suspend the registration of any person for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a registration for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a registration suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a registration suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  Actions taken by the secretary in suspending the registration of a person when required by Section 93-11-157 are not actions from which an appeal may be taken under this section.  Any appeal of a registration suspension that is required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 shall be taken in accordance with the appeal procedure specified in Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, rather than the procedure specified in this section.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. (4)  Any person, persons, company or entity performing any acts to engage in the business of an athlete agent without complying with the requirements of this chapter and being issued a certificate of registration under Section 73-42-11 or 73-42-15 shall be subject to a fine not to exceed Twenty-Five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) and shall be barred from registering under this chapter for three (3) years from the date that finding of the Secretary of State under subsection (2) of this section is final, including the exhaustion of any appeals. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.